test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-guoksagis_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - guoksagis: # N_ODD_WG (CGrad and umlaut)
    guoksagis+N+Sg+Nom: guoksagis
    guoksagis+N+Sg+Gen: guoksagasa
    guoksagis+N+Sg+Acc: guoksagasav
    guoksagis+N+Sg+Ill: guoksagasaj
    guoksagis+N+Sg+Ine: guoksagasan
    guoksagis+N+Sg+Ela: [guoksagasast, guoksagasas]
    guoksagis+N+Sg+Com: [guoksagasajn, guoksagasajna]
    guoksagis+N+Pl+Nom: guoksagasa
    guoksagis+N+Pl+Gen: guoksagasaj
    guoksagis+N+Pl+Acc: guoksagasajt
    guoksagis+N+Pl+Ill: guoksagasajda
    guoksagis+N+Pl+Ine: guoksagasajn
    guoksagis+N+Pl+Ela: [guoksagasajst, guoksagasajs]
    guoksagis+N+Pl+Com: [guoksagasaj, guoksagasajgum]
#    guoksagis+N+Ess: guoksagasin
#    guoksagis+N+Abe: guoksagasahtá

 
 
